Hawaii statutes.
§802-9 Defender council. The governor
shall appoint a defender council consisting of five members, who shall serve at
the governor's pleasure. There shall be at least one member from each of the
counties of the State. The chairperson of the council shall be selected by its
members. Each member shall serve without pay and shall be reimbursed for
necessary expenses incurred while attending meetings and while in the discharge
of the member's responsibilities. The council shall be the governing body of the
office of the state public defender. [L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-9; ren
L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next